Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2081
Hospital; submission of data; release by department.

For each hospital uniform billing form on which a diagnosis code for the external cause of an injury, poisoning, or adverse effect is entered pursuant to section 71-2080, each hospital in this state shall submit data to the Department of Health and Human Services. Such data shall be submitted quarterly and shall include, but not be limited to, the diagnosis code for the external cause of an injury, poisoning, or adverse effect, other diagnosis codes, the procedure codes, admission date, discharge date, disposition code, and demographic data to include, but not be limited to, the birthdate, sex, city and county of residence, and zip code of residence for every patient discharged from a hospital, receiving outpatient services, or released from observation for whom a diagnosis code for the external cause of an injury, poisoning, or adverse effect is recorded pursuant to section 71-2080. This data shall be submitted to the department in written or computer form. The data provided to the department under this section shall be classified for release as determined by the department only in aggregate data reports created by the department. Such aggregate data reports shall be considered public documents.

Laws 1993, LB 387, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 610;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 41;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 518.